Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-102
Notary public; fees.

The Secretary of State shall be entitled to the sum of thirty dollars for receiving an application for a commission to act as a notary public pursuant to section 64-102. The Secretary of State shall be entitled to the sum of thirty dollars for receiving a renewal application pursuant to section 64-104.

The fees received by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit seventy-five percent to the General Fund and twenty-five percent to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1869, § 13, p. 25;

R.S.1913, § 2424;

Laws 1921, c. 99, § 1, p. 364;

C.S.1922, § 2365;

C.S.1929, § 33-104;

R.S.1943, § 33-102;

Laws 1945, c. 145, § 11, p. 494;

Laws 1949, c. 93, § 4, p. 246;

Laws 1963, c. 184, § 1, p. 625;

Laws 1967, c. 396, § 1, p. 1241;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 28;

Laws 1994, LB 1004, § 3;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 30;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 12.